Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 41.1. Industrial Hemp.

§ 3.2-4112.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Cannabis sativa product”
means a product made from any part of the plant Cannabis sativa with a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than that allowed by federal law.

“Deal”
means to temporarily possess industrial hemp grown in compliance with state or federal law that (i) has not been processed and (ii) was not grown and will not be processed by the person temporarily possessing it.

“Dealer”
means any person who is registered pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

to deal in industrial hemp. “Dealer” does not include a retail establishment that sells or offers for sale a hemp product.

“Dealership”
means the location at which a dealer stores or intends to store the industrial hemp in which he deals.

“Federally licensed hemp producer”
means a person who holds a hemp producer license issued by the U.S. Department of Agriculture pursuant to 7 C.F.R. Part 990.

“Grow”
means to plant, cultivate, or harvest a plant or crop.

“Grower”
means any person registered pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

to grow industrial hemp.

“Hemp product”
means a product, including any raw materials from industrial hemp that are used for or added to a food or beverage product, that contains industrial hemp and has completed all stages of processing needed for the product.

“Industrial hemp”
means any part of the plant Cannabis sativa, including seeds thereof, whether growing or not, with a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is no greater than that allowed by federal law. “Industrial hemp” includes an industrial hemp extract that has not completed all stages of processing needed to convert the extract into a hemp product.

“Process”
means to convert industrial hemp into a hemp product.

“Processor”
means a person registered pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

to process industrial hemp.

“Process site”
means the location at which a processor processes or intends to process industrial hemp.

“Production field”
means the land or area on which a grower or a federally licensed hemp producer is growing or intends to grow industrial hemp.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 3 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services (the Department), by December 1, 2019, shall report to the General Assembly on (i) the fiscal impact of the growth of the industrial hemp industry in Virginia upon the Department’s registration program and (ii) any need to alter the registration fee charged by the Department.”

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 4 provides: “That the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, by December 1, 2019, shall report to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources on the viability of markets for Virginia industrial hemp growers, the types of products made from industrial hemp that can be produced in Virginia, and the economic benefits and costs of production of such products.”

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 5 provides: “That the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall, by November 1, 2019, report to the General Assembly on the appropriate standards, if any, for the production of an oil with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than 0.3 percent that is derived from industrial hemp, as defined in §

3.2-4112

of the Code of Virginia as amended by this act.”

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 745, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall convene a working group to assess the opportunities for development and manufacturing in the industrial hemp industry. The working group shall consider (i) federal and state requirements, (ii) key drivers and challenges, (iii) anticipated job growth and wage expectations, (iv) talent and skill requirements, (v) site and building needs, and (vi) manufacturing companies and supply chain requirements. The working group shall consist of the chief executive of the Virginia Economic Development Partnership or his designee; the members of the Tobacco Region Revitalization Commission appointed pursuant to Chapter 31 (§

3.2-3100

et seq.) of Title 3.2 of the Code of Virginia; representatives of the Virginia Agribusiness Council and the Virginia Farm Bureau, who shall be involved in the growing or production of industrial hemp; and the Chief Workforce Development Advisor appointed pursuant to §

2.2-435.6

of the Code of Virginia.

“§ 2. The Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall report by November 30, 2020, to the Chairmen of the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources on the analysis required pursuant to § 1 of this act.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and inserted the definitions of “Cannabis sativa product,” “Deal,” “Dealer,” and “Dealership” and deleted the definitions of “Higher education industrial hemp research program” and “Virginia industrial hemp research program”; rewrote the definition for “Hemp product,” which read: “ ‘Hemp product’ means a product made from industrial hemp”; rewrote the definition for “Industrial hemp,” which read: “ ‘Industrial hemp’ means all parts and varieties of the plant Cannabis sativa, whether growing or not, that contain a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is no greater than that allowed by federal law”; and in the definition for “Process,” substituted “hemp product” for “marketable form.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, in the definition for “Cannabis sativa product,” deleted “including seeds thereof and any derivative, extract, cannabinoid, isomer, acid, salt, or salt of an isomer, whether growing or not” following “plant Cannabis sativa”; in the definition for “Deal,” substituted “temporarily possess” for “buy” and substituted “that (i) has not been processed and (ii) was not grown and will not be processed by the person temporarily possessing it” for “and to sell such industrial hemp to a person who (i) processes industrial hemp in compliance with state or federal law or (ii) sells industrial hemp to a person who processes industrial hemp in compliance with state or federal law”; in the definition for “Dealer,” substituted “a retail establishment that sells or offers for sale a hemp product” for “(i) a grower, (ii) a processor, or (iii) any person who buys industrial hemp for personal use or retail sale in Virginia”; added the definition for “Federally licensed hemp producer‘; in the definition for “Hemp product,” substituted “a product, including any raw materials from industrial hemp that are used for or added to a food or beverage product,” for “any finished product that is otherwise lawful and” and substituted “and has completed all stages of processing needed for the product” for “including rope, building materials, automobile parts, animal bedding, animal feed, cosmetics, oil containing an industrial hemp extract, or food or food additives for human consumption”; in the definition of “Industrial hemp,” deleted “and any derivative, extract, cannabinoid, isomer, acid, salt, or salt of an isomer” following “seeds thereof” and added the last sentence; and in the definition of “Production field,” inserted “or a federally licensed hemp producer.”

§ 3.2-4113.
Production of industrial hemp lawful.

It is lawful for a grower, his agent, or a federally licensed hemp producer to grow, a dealer or his agent to deal in, or a processor or his agent to process industrial hemp in the Commonwealth for any lawful purpose. No federally licensed hemp producer or grower or his agent shall be prosecuted under Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or §

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

, or

18.2-250

for the possession or growing of industrial hemp or any Cannabis sativa with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not exceed the total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration percentage established in federal regulations applicable to negligent violations located at 7 C.F.R. 990.6(b)(3). No dealer or his agent or processor or his agent shall be prosecuted under Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or §

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

, or

18.2-250

or issued a summons or judgment for the possession, dealing, or processing of industrial hemp. In any complaint, information, or indictment, and in any action or proceeding brought for the enforcement of any provision of Article 1 (§

18.2-247

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 or the Drug Control Act (§

54.1-3400

et seq.), it shall not be necessary to negate any exception, excuse, proviso, or exemption contained in this chapter or the Drug Control Act, and the burden of proof of any such exception, excuse, proviso, or exemption shall be on the defendant.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any person to violate any federal law or regulation.

No person shall be prosecuted under Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or §

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

, or

18.2-250

for the involuntary growth of industrial hemp through the inadvertent natural spread of seeds or pollen as a result of proximity to a production field, dealership, or process site.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2016, cc. 61, 170; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 110, 550, 551.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 7 provides: “That, except for (i) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

,

18.2-308.1:5

,

19.2-389.3

,

19.2-392.1

,

19.2-392.4

, and

24.2-233

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §§

19.2-392.2:1

,

19.2-392.2:2

, and

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (ii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia, the provisions of the first, third, fourth, fifth, sixth, and eleventh enactments of this act shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly. The provisions of §§

4.1-1101.1

and

4.1-1105.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall expire on January 1, 2024, if the provisions of the first, third, and fourth enactments of this act are reenacted by the 2022 Session of the General Assembly.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 8 provides: “That (i) the provisions of the second enactment of this act, (ii) the provisions of Article 29 (§

2.2-2499.1

et seq.) of Chapter 24 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

4.1-600

through

4.1-628

,

4.1-1100

,

4.1-1101

,

4.1-1101.1

,

4.1-1105.1

,

4.1-1107

through

4.1-1110

,

4.1-1112

,

4.1-1120

,

4.1-1121

, and

4.1-1302

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, Chapter 15 (§

4.1-1500

et seq.) of Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, §§

15.2-1627

, 16.1-69.48:1, 16.1-228, 16.1-278.8:01,

18.2-251.02

,

18.2-308.09

, and

18.2-308.1:5

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, §

46.2-341.20:7

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, and §

54.1-3442.6

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and (iii) the repeal of §

18.2-250.1

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 26 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 61 and 170 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “or

3.2-4117

” in the first two sentences, substituted “any lawful purpose, including the manufacture of industrial hemp products or scientific, agricultural, or other research related to other lawful applications for industrial hemp” for “the purpose of research as part of the industrial hemp research program,” substituted “the possession, cultivation, or manufacture of industrial hemp plant material and seeds or industrial hemp products” for “(i) the possession or cultivation of industrial hemp plant material or seeds as part of the industrial hemp research program or (ii) the manufacture of industrial hemp products as part of the industrial hemp research program”; inserted “or a grower licensed pursuant to §

3.2-4117

” at the end of subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the first two sentences in subsection A, which formerly read: “It is lawful for a person licensed pursuant to §

3.2-4115

or

3.2-4117

to cultivate, produce, or otherwise grow industrial hemp in the Commonwealth for any lawful purpose, including the manufacture of industrial hemp products or scientific, agricultural, or other research related to other lawful applications for industrial hemp. No person licensed pursuant to §

3.2-4115

or

3.2-4117

shall be prosecuted under §

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

,

18.2-250

, or

18.2-250

.1 for the possession, cultivation, or manufacture of industrial hemp plant material and seeds or industrial hemp products”; in subsection B, deleted “that has been adopted in Virginia under this chapter” following “industrial hemp” in the second sentence; and in subsection C, substituted “production field or process site” for “licensed grower or a grower licensed pursuant to §

3.2-4117

.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and in subsection A, inserted “a dealer or his agent to deal in” and deleted “including the manufacture of a hemp product or scientific, agricultural, or other research related to other lawful applications for industrial hemp” at the end of the first sentence and inserted “dealer or his agent” and “dealing” in the second sentence; in subsection B, deleted the second sentence, which read: “If any part of this chapter conflicts with a provision of federal law relating to industrial hemp, the federal provision shall control to the extent of the conflict”; and in subsection C, inserted “dealership.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “or a federally licensed hemp producer,” in the second sentence, substituted “federally licensed hemp producer or grower or his agent” for “grower or his agent, dealer or his agent, or processor or his agent,” inserted “issued a summons or judgment under” preceding “18.2-250.1,” deleted “dealing, or processing” preceding “of industrial hemp” and added “or any Cannabis sativa with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration that does not exceed the total delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration percentage established in federal regulations applicable to negligent violations located at 7 C.F.R. 990.6(b)(3)” at the end and added the third sentence; in subsection C, inserted “issued a summons or judgment under” preceding “18.2-250.1”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in subsections A and C, substituted “Chapter 11 (§

4.1-1100

et seq.) of Title 4.1 or §

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

, or

18.2-250

” for “§

18.2-247

,

18.2-248

,

18.2-248.01

,

18.2-248.1

,

18.2-250

, or

18.2-250.1

.”

§ 3.2-4114.
Regulations.

The Board may adopt regulations pursuant to this chapter as necessary to register persons to grow, deal in, or process industrial hemp or implement the provisions of this chapter.

Upon publication by the U.S. Department of Agriculture in the Federal Register of any final rule regarding industrial hemp that materially expands opportunities for growing, producing, or dealing in industrial hemp in the Commonwealth, the Board shall immediately adopt amendments conforming Department regulations to such federal final rule. Such adoption of regulations by the Board shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2020, c. 620.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

That the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall promulgate the regulations required by subsections C and D of §

3.2-4114

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, to become effective by July 1, 2023. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 550 and 551, cl. 16 provides: “That the Board of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall promulgate the regulations required by subsections C and D of §

3.2-4114

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, to become effective by July 1, 2023. The provisions of this enactment shall become effective in due course.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the section, which formerly read: “The Board may adopt regulations pursuant to this chapter as necessary to (i) license persons to grow industrial hemp or (ii) administer the industrial hemp research program.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and inserted “deal in.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 620, effective April 2, 2020, inserted subsection B and designated the preceding paragraph as subsection A.

§ 3.2-4114.1.
Repealed by Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 2, effective March 21, 2019.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-4114.1

, pertaining to higher education industrial hemp research programs and the Virginia industrial hemp research program, derived from 2018, cc. 689, 690.

§ 3.2-4114.2.
Authority of Commissioner; notice to law enforcement; report.

The Commissioner may charge a nonrefundable fee not to exceed $250 for any application for registration or renewal of registration allowed under this chapter. The Commissioner may charge a nonrefundable fee for the tetrahydrocannabinol testing allowed under this chapter. All fees collected by the Commissioner shall be deposited in the state treasury.

The Commissioner shall adopt regulations establishing a fee structure for registration. With the exception of §

2.2-4031

, no provision of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) or public participation guideline adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption of any regulation pursuant to this subsection. However, prior to adopting any regulation pursuant to this subsection, the Commissioner shall review the recommendation of an advisory panel that shall consider the economic impact of any proposed fee amount on the Commonwealth’s industrial hemp industry. The advisory panel shall, at a minimum, include (i) an agribusiness representative or organization, (ii) a farming representative or organization, and (iii) a hemp industry representative or organization. Prior to adopting any regulation pursuant to this subsection, the Commissioner shall publish a notice of opportunity to comment in the Virginia Register of Regulations and post the action on the Virginia Regulatory Town Hall. Such notice shall contain (a) a summary of the proposed regulation; (b) the text of the proposed regulation; and (c) the name, address, and telephone number of the agency contact person responsible for receiving public comments. Such notice shall be made at least 60 days in advance of the last date prescribed in such notice of submittals of public comment. The legislative review provisions of subsections A and B of §

2.2-4014

shall apply to the promulgation or final adoption process of regulations pursuant to this subsection. The Commissioner shall consider and keep on file all public comments received for any regulation adopted pursuant to this subsection.

The Commissioner may establish an application period for a registration or renewal of registration allowed under this chapter.

The Commissioner shall notify the Superintendent of State Police of each registration issued by the Commissioner under this chapter and each license submitted to the Commissioner by a federally licensed hemp producer.

The Commissioner shall forward a copy or appropriate electronic record of each registration issued by the Commissioner under this chapter and each license submitted to the Commissioner by a federally licensed hemp producer to the chief law-enforcement officer of the county or city where industrial hemp will be grown, dealt, or processed.

The Commissioner may monitor the industrial hemp grown, dealt, or processed by a person registered pursuant to subsection A of §

3.2-4115

and provide for random sampling and testing of the industrial hemp in accordance with any criteria established by the Commissioner and at the cost of the grower, dealer, or processor, for compliance with tetrahydrocannabinol limits and for other appropriate purposes established pursuant to §

3.2-4114

. In addition to any routine inspection and sampling, the Commissioner may inspect and sample the industrial hemp at any production field, dealership, or process site during normal business hours without advance notice if he has reason to believe a violation of this chapter is occurring or has occurred.

The Commissioner may require a grower, dealer, or processor to destroy, at the cost of the grower, dealer, or processor and in a manner approved of and verified by the Commissioner, any Cannabis sativa that the grower grows, in which the dealer deals, or that the processor processes that has been tested and is found to have a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than that allowed by federal law, or any Cannabis sativa product that the processor produces.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection G, if the provisions of subdivisions 1 and 2 are included in a plan that (i) is submitted by the Department pursuant to § 10113 of the federal Agriculture Improvement Act of 2018, P.L. 115-334, (ii) requires the Department to monitor and regulate the production of industrial hemp in the Commonwealth, and (iii) is approved by the U.S. Secretary of Agriculture:

The Commissioner may require a grower, dealer, or processor to destroy, at the cost of the grower, dealer, or processor and in a manner approved of and verified by the Commissioner, any Cannabis sativa that the grower grows, in which the dealer deals, or that the processor processes that has been tested and is found to have a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than 0.6 percent.

If such a test of Cannabis sativa indicates a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than 0.6 percent but less than one percent, the Commissioner shall allow the grower, dealer, or processor to request that the Cannabis sativa be sampled and tested again before he requires its destruction.

The Commissioner shall advise the Superintendent of State Police or the chief law-enforcement officer of the appropriate county or city when, with a culpable mental state greater than negligence, a grower grows, a dealer deals in, or a processor processes any Cannabis sativa with a concentration of tetrahydrocannabinol that is greater than that allowed by federal law or a processor produces a Cannabis sativa product.

The Commissioner may pursue any permits or waivers from the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration or appropriate federal agency that he determines to be necessary for the advancement of the industrial hemp industry.

The Commissioner may establish a corrective action plan to address a negligent violation of any provision of this chapter.

History.

2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 3 provides “That the Virginia Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services (the Department), by December 1, 2019, shall report to the General Assembly on (i) the fiscal impact of the growth of the industrial hemp industry in Virginia upon the Department’s registration program and (ii) any need to alter the registration fee charged by the Department.”

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 5 provides: “That the Secretary of Agriculture and Forestry and the Secretary of Health and Human Resources shall, by November 1, 2019, report to the General Assembly on the appropriate standards, if any, for the production of an oil with a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of no greater than 0.3 percent that is derived from industrial hemp, as defined in §

3.2-4112

of the Code of Virginia as amended by this act.”

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 99 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

3.2-4114.2

and

3.2-4115

, Code of Virginia, the Commissioner shall charge an annual nonrefundable fee of $150 on each application for registration, or renewal of registration, as an industrial hemp grower, an annual nonrefundable fee of $200 on each application for registration as an industrial hemp processor, and an annual nonrefundable fee of $250 for registration as an industrial hemp dealer pursuant to Chapter 41 of Title 3.2, Code of Virginia.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and added subsection F, deleted former subsection B, pertaining to the establishment of a minimum size for a production field that qualified a person for a grower registration and deleted former subsection J pertaining to annual report on the research program by Commissioner to the Governor and General Assembly; in subsection A, delete “(i)” preceding “any application” and substituted “The Commissioner may charge a nonrefundable fee for the” for “and (ii)”; in subsection B, inserted “dealerships”; in subsection C, inserted “dealt”; in subsection D, inserted “dealt,” “dealer” and “dealership”; in subsection E, inserted “dealer” twice, substituted “in which the dealer deals, or that” for “or,” and added “or any Cannabis sativa product that the processor produces” at the end; in subsection G, substituted “shall advise the Attorney General of the United States and” for “may advise” and inserted “with a culpable mental state greater than negligence,” “a dealer deals in” and “or a processor produces a Cannabis sativa product”; in subsection H, substituted “the industrial hemp industry” for “a higher education industrial hemp research program or the Virginia industrial hemp research program”; in subsection I, substituted “establish a corrective action plan to address a negligent violation of any provision of this chapter” for “cooperatively seek funds from public and private sources to implement a higher education industrial hemp research program or the Virginia industrial hemp research program”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, in subsection A, substituted “$250” for “$50”; inserted subsections B and C; in subsection D, substituted “each registration issued by the Commissioner under this chapter and each license submitted to the Commissioner by a federally licensed hemp producer” for “the locations of all industrial hemp production fields, dealerships, and process sites”; in subsection E, inserted “and each license submitted to the Commissioner by a federally licensed hemp producer”; in subsection F, in the first sentence, substituted “may monitor” for “shall be responsible for monitoring,” substituted “provide for random sampling and” for “shall provide for random” and inserted “in accordance with any criteria established by the Commissioner and”; in subsection H, substituted “subsection G” for “subsection E”; in subsection I, deleted “the Attorney General of the United States and” following “shall advise”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 3.2-4115.
Issuance of registrations; exemption.

The Commissioner shall establish a registration program to allow a person to grow, deal in, or process industrial hemp in the Commonwealth.

Any person seeking to grow, deal in, or process industrial hemp in the Commonwealth shall apply to the Commissioner for a registration on a form provided by the Commissioner. At a minimum, the application shall include:

The name and mailing address of the applicant;

The legal description and geographic data sufficient for locating (i) the land on which the applicant intends to grow industrial hemp, (ii) the site at which the applicant intends to deal in industrial hemp, or (iii) the site at which the applicant intends to process industrial hemp. A registration shall authorize industrial hemp growth, dealing in, or processing only at the location specified in the registration;

A signed statement indicating whether the applicant has ever been convicted of a felony. A person with a prior felony drug conviction within 10 years of applying for a registration under this section shall not be eligible to be registered;

Written consent allowing the sheriff’s office, police department, or Department of State Police, if a registration is ultimately issued to the applicant, to enter the premises on which the industrial hemp is grown, dealt in, or processed to conduct physical inspections of the industrial hemp and to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter. No more than two physical inspections shall be conducted under this subdivision per year, unless a valid search warrant for an inspection has been issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Written consent allowing the Commissioner or his designee to enter the premises on which the industrial hemp is grown, dealt in, or processed to conduct inspections and sampling of the industrial hemp to ensure compliance with the requirements of this chapter;

A statement of the approximate square footage or acreage of the location he intends to use as a production field, dealership, or process site;

Any other information required by the Commissioner; and

The payment of a nonrefundable application fee, in an amount set by the Commissioner.

Each registration issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance and may be renewed in successive years. Each annual renewal shall require the payment of a registration renewal fee, in an amount set by the Commissioner.

All records, data, and information filed in support of a registration application submitted pursuant to this section and all information on a hemp producer license issued by the U.S. Department of Agriculture submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to this section shall be considered proprietary and excluded from the provisions of the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.).

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B, no federally licensed hemp producer shall be required to apply to the Commissioner for a registration to grow industrial hemp in the Commonwealth. Each federally licensed hemp producer shall submit to the Commissioner a copy of his hemp producer license issued by the U.S. Department of Agriculture pursuant to 7 C.F.R. Part 990.

History.

2015, cc. 158, 180; 2018, cc. 689, 690; 2019, cc. 653, 654; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 110.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 653 and 654, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 99 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

3.2-4114.2

and

3.2-4115

, Code of Virginia, the Commissioner shall charge an annual nonrefundable fee of $150 on each application for registration, or renewal of registration, as an industrial hemp grower, an annual nonrefundable fee of $200 on each application for registration as an industrial hemp processor, and an annual nonrefundable fee of $250 for registration as an industrial hemp dealer pursuant to Chapter 41 of Title 3.2, Code of Virginia.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 689 and 690 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 653 and 654 are identical, effective March 21, 2019, and in subsection A, inserted “deal in” and deleted “in a controlled fashion solely and exclusively as part of a higher education industrial hemp research program or the Virginia industrial hemp research program” from the end; in subsection B, inserted “deal in” and substituted “in the Commonwealth” for “as part of a higher education industrial hemp research program or the Virginia industrial hemp research program”; in subdivision B 2, inserted clause (ii), redesignated former clause (ii) as clause (iii) and inserted “dealing in”; in subdivisions B 4 and 5, inserted “dealt in”; deleted former subdivision B 5, which read: “If the applicant intends to participate in a higher education industrial hemp research program, documentation of an agreement between an institution of higher education and the applicant that states that the applicant, if registered pursuant to subsection A, will be a participant in the higher education industrial hemp research program managed by that institution of higher education”; rewrote subdivision B 6, which read: “If the applicant intends to participate in the Virginia industrial hemp research program, a statement of the approximate square footage or acreage of the location he intends to use as a production field or process site and a description of the research he plans to conduct to advance the industrial hemp industry”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 110, effective March 12, 2021, deleted “not to exceed $50” at the end of subdivision A 8 and at the end of subsection C; inserted “and all information on a hemp producer license issued by the U.S. Department of Agriculture submitted to the Commissioner pursuant to this section” in subsection D; and added subsection E.